Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1516
Candidate filing form; prohibited acts; penalty.

Any person who falsely makes or falsely swears to any candidate filing form or any part thereof, fraudulently defaces or destroys any candidate filing form or any part thereof, files or receives for filing any candidate filing form knowing that the form or any part thereof is falsely made, or suppresses any duly filed candidate filing form or any part thereof shall be guilty of a Class III felony.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 415;

Laws 1997, LB 764, § 107;

Laws 2026, LB1075, § 41.
July 18, 2026